src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-ansted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - äʹnsted: # Verb 'to steal' - full paradigm
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [äʹnstam, ääʹnstam]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [äʹnstak, ääʹnstak]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääʹnast
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [äʹnstep, ääʹnstep]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [äʹnsteʹped, ääʹnsteʹped]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [äʹnste, ääʹnste]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: [äʹnstet, ääʹnstet]

     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [äʹnstem, ääʹnstem]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [äʹnstiǩ, ääʹnstiǩ]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [äʹnsti, ääʹnsti]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [äʹnstim, äʹnstin, ääʹnstim, ääʹnstin, äʹnstiim, äʹnstiin, ääʹnstiim, ääʹnstiin]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [äʹnstid, ääʹnstid, äʹnstiid, ääʹnstiid]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [äʹnste, ääʹnste]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: [äʹnsteš, ääʹnsteš]

     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg1: [äʹnsteʹžem, ääʹnsteʹžem]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg2: [äʹnsteʹžiǩ, ääʹnsteʹžiǩ]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg3: [äʹnstež, ääʹnstež]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl1: [äʹnsteʹžep, äʹnsteʹžim, äʹnsteʹžin, ääʹnsteʹžep, ääʹnsteʹžim, ääʹnsteʹžin]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl2: [äʹnsteʹžid, ääʹnsteʹžid]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl3: [äʹnsteʹže, ääʹnsteʹže]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg4: [äʹnsteʹžet, ääʹnsteʹžet]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [äʹnsteʹže, ääʹnsteʹže]

     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg1: [äʹnsteʹčem, ääʹnsteʹčem]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg2: [äʹnsteʹčiǩ, ääʹnsteʹčiǩ, äʹnsteʹčeǩ, ääʹnsteʹčeǩ]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg3: [äʹnsteʹči, ääʹnsteʹči]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [äʹnsteʹčim, äʹnsteʹčin, äʹnsteʹčep, ääʹnsteʹčim, ääʹnsteʹčin, ääʹnsteʹčep]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl2: [äʹnsteʹčid, ääʹnsteʹčid]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl3: [äʹnsteʹče, ääʹnsteʹče]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg4: [äʹnsteʹčeš, ääʹnsteʹčeš]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [äʹnsteʹče, ääʹnsteʹče]

     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Sg2: ääʹnest
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Sg3: [äʹnstââǥǥas, ääʹnstââǥǥas]
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl1: [äʹnstâkap, ääʹnstâkap]
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl2: [äʹnsteʹǩed, ääʹnsteʹǩed]
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl3: [äʹnstâkaz, ääʹnstâkaz]
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: [äʹnstuku, ääʹnstuku]
     äʹnsted+V+Actio+Ess: [äʹnsteʹmmen, ääʹnsteʹmmen]
     äʹnsted+V+Actio: [äʹnstem, ääʹnstem]
     äʹnsted+V+Act+PrsPrc: [äʹnsteei, ääʹnsteei]
     äʹnsted+V+Act+PrfPrc: [äʹnstam, äʹnstamma, ääʹnstamma, ääʹnstam]
     äʹnsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [äʹnstummu, äʹnstuum, äʹnstum, ääʹnstummu, ääʹnstuum, ääʹnstum]
# deduced from Sammallahti/Mosnikoff 1991 -ummu, -uum and -um occur as variants
     äʹnsted+V+VAbess: [äʹnsteǩâni, ääʹnsteǩâni, ääʹnstekâni, äʹnsteǩenai, ääʹnsteǩeânnai, ääʹnsteǩânai, ääʹnstekani, äʹnsteǩânai, äʹnsteǩeânai, äʹnsteǩani, äʹnsteǩeânnai, ääʹnsteǩenai, ääʹnsteǩani, äʹnstekâni, äʹnstekani, ääʹnsteǩeânai]
     äʹnsted+V+Ger+Ess: [äʹnsteeʹn, ääʹnsteeʹn]
     äʹnsted+V+Ger+Instr: [äʹnsteeʹl, ääʹnsteeʹl]
